Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 176 Department of Highways
176.400.
Covered wooden bridges — Administrative control — Title — Maintenance.

Administrative control of covered wooden bridges designated as state shrines shall be shared by the Transportation Cabinet, the Department of Parks, the Kentucky Heritage Council, and the authorities created under KRS

176.410

.

The Transportation Cabinet shall maintain all covered wooden bridges in the Commonwealth which are on public roads and open to vehicular traffic. The cabinet shall maintain the bridges for safety and for historical and aesthetic beauty. The cabinet shall prepare estimates of the cost of maintaining covered wooden bridges which are on public roads and open to vehicular traffic and shall identify and include the total of these estimates in its biennial budget request.

The cabinet may delegate its responsibility for maintenance of covered bridges located on roads maintained by a county to the local government responsible for such roads. Delegation of responsibility for maintenance of covered bridges to a local government shall require periodic inspection by the cabinet.

Nothing in this section shall prevent an appropriate unit of government from closing a covered wooden bridge to vehicular traffic.

The Department of Parks shall be responsible for all covered wooden bridges located in the Commonwealth which are on public property and no longer open to vehicular traffic. The department shall maintain these bridges in sound structural condition and for historical and aesthetic beauty. The department shall prepare estimates of the cost of maintaining covered wooden bridges for which it has a responsibility and shall identify and include the total of these estimates in its biennial budget request.

When an appropriation is made to a covered wooden bridge authority created under the provisions of KRS

176.410

, the Department of Parks shall transfer the obligation of maintenance for the bridges designated in the appropriation to that authority.

An authority may retransfer the right of possession or title and the obligation of maintenance of covered bridges under its jurisdiction to the Department of Parks.

The Heritage Division of the Kentucky Heritage Council may determine that an authority is inactive or unable to discharge its responsibilities and may transfer the right of title or possession to covered bridges under the jurisdiction of the authority to the Department of Parks. The division shall give notice of such an action to the authority and the Department of Parks.

Prior to administering a project that involves the preservation, restoration, or maintenance of a covered wooden bridge, the administering entity shall:

Consider all recommendations submitted pursuant to KRS

176.410

by a covered wooden bridge authority pertaining to any bridge involved in the project;

Consult with the covered wooden bridge authority dedicated to the preservation, restoration, and maintenance of any bridge involved in the project, if such an authority exists; and

Hold at least one (1) public hearing within the county in which the bridge is located, with due notice given pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. The public hearing shall be held no later than sixty (60) days prior to the date the project is commenced or contracted, whichever is earlier.

The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to any emergency maintenance project that involves a covered wooden bridge if the project cost is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection (9) of this section, any project that involves the preservation, restoration, or maintenance of a covered wooden bridge shall require approval by the Kentucky Heritage Council prior to the date the project is commenced or contracted, whichever is earlier.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 323, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 396, § 45, effective July 15, 1982; 2004, ch. 164, § 1, effective April 21, 2004.

176.410.
County or multicounty covered wooden bridge authority — Membership of authority — Duties and functions of authority.

Except as provided by KRS

176.400

, at the request of citizens or organizations of a county or multicounty region, the Heritage Division of the Kentucky Heritage Council shall certify to the Governor the creation of a county or multicounty covered wooden bridge authority for that county or multicounty region.

An authority shall consist of members appointed as follows:

The Governor shall appoint one (1) member from each participating county, unless the authority has only one (1) participating county, in which case the Governor shall appoint three (3) members from the participating county; and

The fiscal court of each participating county shall submit to the Governor a list of three (3) candidates, and the Governor shall appoint one (1) member from each list unless the authority has two (2) or fewer participating counties, in which case the Governor shall appoint two (2) members from each list.

The members of an authority shall hold office for terms of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and qualify except that the terms of office of the members first appointed shall be staggered. An authority may elect by majority voice officers deemed necessary by its members. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. An authority shall meet at the call of its chairman, but at least twice during each calendar year.

An authority shall be dedicated to the preservation, restoration, and maintenance of all covered wooden bridges in the county or multicounty region for which it is created.

For covered wooden bridges not open to vehicular traffic, the duties and functions of an authority shall be to:

Review, recommend, and administer projects and programs to insure the proper preservation, restoration, and maintenance of covered wooden bridges in the county or multicounty region for which it is created.

Advise, consult, and cooperate with state, local, and national officials and agencies, and with the Heritage Division of the Kentucky Heritage Council as provided by KRS

176.400

and

176.410

, to accomplish the purposes for which the authority is established.

For covered wooden bridges open to vehicular traffic, the duties and functions of an authority shall be to:

Make recommendations to the Transportation Cabinet and local officials on the proper preservation, restoration, and maintenance of covered wooden bridges in the county or multicounty region for which it is created.

Advise, consult, and cooperate with state, local, and national officials and agencies to accomplish the purposes for which the authority is established.

An authority may:

Accept grants or other funds or property from any source, public or private;

Enter into such contractual relationships as may be necessary;

Acquire real property, by gift or devise or by purchase pursuant to the provisions of KRS

45A.045

, and hold the same in the name of the Commonwealth for the use and benefit of the authority;

Adopt rules and regulations necessary to the performance of its duties and functions.

Members of an authority may be reimbursed in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 44 and 45 for actual and reasonable expenses incurred in the furtherance of the authority’s activities.

The receipt, control, and expenditure of funds shall be subject to the general provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes governing financial administration of state agencies.

For covered wooden bridges not open to vehicular traffic, each authority shall develop a program for the preservation, restoration, and maintenance of those covered wooden bridges in the county or multicounty region for which it was established. It shall select the bridges to be preserved, restored, or maintained within a biennium and shall prepare estimates of the cost of preservation, restoration, or maintenance within that biennium.

The program developed by an authority shall be submitted to the Heritage Division of the Kentucky Heritage Council. Upon approval by the division, the authority shall submit its program as its biennial budget request.

When an appropriation is made to an authority to fund its program for the preservation, restoration, and maintenance of covered wooden bridges, title to all covered wooden bridges to be preserved, restored, or maintained under its authority shall be transferred to the authority. Preservation, restoration, and maintenance of covered wooden bridges shall comply with the program approved by the Heritage Division of the Kentucky Heritage Council and shall be administered by the authority. Each authority is authorized to enter into any agreement or contract necessary to implement an approved and funded program.

For covered wooden bridges open to vehicular traffic, each authority shall develop a biennial list of recommendations for the preservation, restoration, and maintenance of those covered wooden bridges in the county or multicounty region for which it was created. This list shall be submitted biennially to the Transportation Cabinet and all fiscal courts within the authority’s jurisdiction.

There is established the covered wooden bridge authority for the counties of Bracken, Fleming, Lewis, Mason, and Robertson as a pilot project.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 323, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 396, § 46, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 496, § 55, effective July 13, 1990; 2004, ch. 164, § 2, effective April 21, 2004.

176.415.
Flags to be displayed at rest areas — Human trafficking hotline telephone number to be prominently displayed in each rest area restroom.

The Department of Highways shall display the following flags at each rest area along the Commonwealth’s interstate and turnpike system:

The flag of the United States of America, to honor our country and the democratic ideals of our forefathers;

The flag of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, as specified by KRS

2.030

, to honor the Commonwealth and its citizens; and

The flag of the National League of Families of American Prisoners of War and Missing in Southeast Asia, the black and white banner commonly known as the POW/MIA flag, which symbolizes America’s missing service members and our unwavering determination to account for them.

The Department of Highways shall post in every restroom located on the premises of each rest area in the Commonwealth a printed sign in English and Spanish at least eleven (11) inches by fourteen (14) inches in size, with letters at least one (1) inch high, displaying the current telephone hotline number of the National Human Trafficking Resource Center or any federally funded successor entity. The sign shall be:

Created using gender-neutral language supplied to the Department of Highways by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and

Posted in a prominent place easily seen by patrons.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 28, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 171, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

176.419.
Definition of “project” and “six (6) year road plan” for KRS 45.245, 45.246, 176.420, 176.430, and 176.440. [Repealed.]

176.420.
Continuing study of highway needs by Department of Highways — Submission of six (6) year road plan to General Assembly — Electronic version. [Repealed.]

176.430.
Transportation Cabinet to study needs of highways and develop recommended six (6) year road plan that identifies individual transportation projects — Proposed biennial highway construction plan — Factors to be considered in development of each project — Monthly transmission of project data to General Assembly — Cabinet may expend funds necessary to complete authorized projects — Digitized maps.

The Transportation Cabinet shall undertake a continuing study of the needs of the highways under its jurisdiction for the purpose of bringing existing facilities to acceptable standards or for the replacement of existing facilities when required.

The Transportation Cabinet shall develop a recommended six (6) year road plan that identifies the individual transportation projects or portions thereof that are scheduled to be constructed in each county. The recommended six (6) year road plan shall include a recommended biennial highway construction plan. The recommended six (6) year road plan and recommended biennial highway construction plan shall be submitted to the General Assembly as required by KRS 48.110(6)(f). The six (6) year road plan shall include but shall not be limited to the following information for each project:

The county name;

The Kentucky Transportation Cabinet project identification number;

The route where the project is located;

The length of the project;

A description of the project and the scope of improvement;

The type of local, state, or federal funds to be used on the project;

The stage of development for the design, right-of-way, utility, and construction phase;

The fiscal year in which each phase of the project should commence;

The estimated cost for each phase of the project; and

The estimated cost to complete the project.

The Transportation Cabinet shall identify projects in the six (6) year road plan that may, in accordance with this section, be advanced from later years, to maximize the use of all funds available to the cabinet, and to plan for the historical precedent of projects being delayed due to unforeseen circumstances. As required by KRS

48.110

, the Governor shall submit to the General Assembly, as part of the proposed biennial highway construction plan, a list of projects from the last four (4) years of the six (6) year road plan, not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the recommended biennial highway construction appropriation, which can be advanced if additional money is received and all projects included in the enacted biennial highway construction plan have been advanced or completed to the extent possible.

In developing the design, right-of-way, utility, and construction phase of each project, the following factors shall be considered but are not exclusive:

Alignment of existing roads;

The width or elevation of existing roadways and shoulder surfaces;

The width of rights-of-way;

The cost of each phase of the project plus a separate identification of the cabinet’s administrative costs for each phase;

The type and volume of traffic;

The condition of structures and drainage;

The accident rate;

The geographic distribution of roadways to be constructed or reconstructed; and

The social, economic, and environmental impact of the proposed project.

The Transportation Cabinet shall, on a monthly basis, transmit electronically to the General Assembly through the Legislative Research Commission a report on all activity relating to all projects with open activity conducted by the Transportation Cabinet during the biennium. The data for each project shall contain all cabinet activity on projects funded through the road fund, including resurfacing and rural and secondary projects, and shall also include but not be limited to the following:

District number and project item number, which shall remain in effect throughout the entire life of the project, subject to the following conditions:

A project split into more than one (1) project during its life shall maintain the same item number with a suffix;

Two (2) or more projects merged shall be identified by the new merged project maintaining the project item number of one (1) of the projects being merged. The total cost of the merged project shall be set forth; and

A project that has been merged with another project and all funds authorized for the initial project that is subsequently shifted to the new merged project shall remain in the six (6) year road plan and shall be identified with a cross reference to the superseded project and superseded project item number;

The county name and county number;

The route prefix, route number, and route suffix;

Termini description including beginning milepoint and ending milepoint;

Type of work;

Length of the project in miles;

Project authorization system number, date the project was authorized, the TD-10 number authorizing the project, and the amount authorized;

Year the project was enacted in a six (6) year road plan, and the notation “A” if the project is active and the notation “I” if the project is inactive;

The phase code “P” for the planning phase, “D” for the design phase, “R” for the right-of-way phase, “U” for the utility phase, and “C” for the construction phase;

The original estimate, fund code, and fiscal year each phase is expected to begin as enacted in the six (6) year road plan;

The current estimate, fund code, and fiscal year each phase is expected to begin;

The status of funding for each phase;

The date current information has been changed for each phase;

The letting date for each phase;

Total number of right-of-way parcels, deeds signed, suits filed, and right-of-way entries completed;

The date right-of-way plans are to be submitted to the central office in Frankfort and the status of right-of-way plans;

Total utility relocations to be completed and the actual number completed;

The award date, the construction project code number, and the award amount for the construction phase;

The total number of contract change orders issued for each phase, the date of the most recent change order, and the net change order amount for each phase;

The name of the contractor, the contractor’s vendor number in the Statewide accounting system, current contract amount, and the current amount earned by the contractor;

The estimated date for completion of the project, current percentage of work completed based upon time, and the actual contract completion date;

The department’s engineer’s estimate for the project; and

Total expenditures by phase.

The department shall transmit on a monthly basis, electronic data to the General Assembly through the Legislative Research Commission on the activity on all state resurfacing projects and all rural secondary projects that shall include as much applicable information as possible as identified in subsection (5) of this section.

In implementing the enacted biennial highway construction plan, the Transportation Cabinet may expend funds necessary to complete the projects authorized, amended only by variations necessitated by bid or unforeseen circumstances.

The department shall pursue digitizing all Kentucky roads on a geographic information system as funds are made available by the General Assembly. The digitized maps shall merge map layers and text layers to produce maps that display geographic information and textual information detailing the six (6) year road plan as enacted by the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 138, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 502, § 7, effective July 1, 1990; 1992, ch. 433, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 299, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 532, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 20, effective June 25, 2009.

176.431.
Transportation Cabinet’s authorization for demonstration road and bridge related projects in each fiscal year — Bidding process and basis of selection for projects — Annual report to Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

Notwithstanding any conflicting provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapters 45A and 177, each fiscal year, the Transportation Cabinet is authorized to utilize design/build procurement methods for up to:

Five (5) major demonstration road and bridge related projects, with a total cost of each project not to exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000); and

Ten (10) demonstration road and bridge related projects, with a total cost of each project not to exceed seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000).

The projects outlined in this subsection shall be identified in the biennial highway construction plan.

For procurement purposes, the Transportation Cabinet shall utilize a qualifications- based bidding process within the context of the provisions of this chapter. The projects shall be selected based on engineering factors that determine a design/build process will provide the best value for the Commonwealth. Factors to consider may include but not be limited to the following: project delivery schedule, technical complexity, constructability, and estimated project cost.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall determine the nature and scope of each design/build project, and shall submit a report identifying and detailing the demonstration road and bridge related projects, including the estimated cost savings, to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by December 1 of each fiscal year.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 67, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/25/2013). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has inserted subsection designations into this statute. The words in the text were not changed.

176.432.
Fiscal-year-to-date funding status reports on highway construction contingency account

The department shall transmit, on a quarterly basis, electronic data to the General Assembly through the Legislative Research Commission giving a fiscal-year-to-date funding status report on the highway construction contingency account established under KRS

45.247

.

The report shall include:

The available budget of the account;

Authorizations by funding code category;

The total available balance in the account; and

For the most recent quarter, a listing of individual projects and agreements authorized, including the location, a physical description, and amount of authorization.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 45, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

176.433.
State contingency funding code for six-year road plan.

The Transportation Cabinet shall create a new funding code to be used in the six (6) year road plan to be known as state contingency funds and the abbreviation the cabinet shall use for this funding code shall be SC. The state contingency funding code shall be in addition to all other funding codes used by the cabinet in the six (6) year road plan and shall be used to identify all projects funded with moneys from the highway construction contingency account established under KRS

45.247

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 532, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2019 ch. 45, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

176.435.
Electronic information databases on construction programs. [Repealed.]

176.440.
State highway engineer to provide cost estimate for any project that legislator desires in six year road plan.

The state highway engineer shall provide a cost estimate for any project that a member of the General Assembly desires to be considered for advancement or inclusion in the six (6) year road plan.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 138, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 502, § 8, effective July 1, 1990; 1992, ch. 433, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 299, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 532, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 58, § 17, effective June 21, 2001; 2009, ch. 78, § 21, effective June 25, 2009.

176.450.
Secretary’s emergency fund — No project to be undertaken if not included in program — Exceptions — Additional projects to be submitted to interim joint committee on transportation — Cost limit for preliminary analysis of prospective projects. [Repealed.]

176.460.
Project to be commenced in biennium for which it is planned — Effect of failure to commence — Exceptions — Reinstatement of funds for delayed project — Limitations on application of KRS 176.420 to 176.460. [Repealed.]

176.470.
Annual report on status of highway projects. [Repealed.]

176.500.
Mississippi River Parkway Commission of Kentucky — Members — Duties — Reimbursement for expenses.

The Mississippi River Parkway Commission of Kentucky is hereby established to serve as the local coordinating agency for the development of the Great River Road along the Mississippi River from Canada to the Gulf of Mexico. The commission shall be attached to the Office of the Secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet for administrative purposes.

The commission shall consist of the following ten (10) members: Four (4) citizen members, appointed by the Governor, and consisting of one (1) member from each of the four (4) counties that border the Mississippi River, who shall serve a term of four (4) years and may serve until a successor is appointed. Four (4) members shall be the respective county judges/executive of Ballard, Carlisle, Fulton, and Hickman Counties in Kentucky. Other members shall be the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or his designee; and the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, or his designee. The commission shall annually elect a chairman and shall meet quarterly or upon call of the chairman with ten (10) days’ written notice. Six (6) members present shall constitute a quorum for the official conduct of business. The commission may enter into contracts with the Purchase Area Development District to provide administrative services.

Members shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed according to state regulations for actual and necessary expenses incurred in conducting commission business.

The commission shall assure that the proper direction is taken in developing a corridor of scenic, historical, and archaeological significance through the Kentucky counties of Ballard, Carlisle, Hickman, and Fulton.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 99, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 114, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 194, § 57, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 48, § 15, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 39, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 53, effective June 25, 2009.

176.505.
Motorcycle Advisory Commission for Highway Safety established.

The Motorcycle Advisory Commission for Highway Safety is established as an advisory body to assist the Transportation Cabinet in ensuring that highway design, construction, and maintenance policies and procedures consider the specific needs of motorcyclists.

The commission shall examine Transportation Cabinet policies and procedures in areas including but not limited to crash barrier design, road maintenance practices, road construction, traffic control devices, and intelligent transportation systems, and recommend changes where necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 122, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

176.506.
Membership of commission — Officers — Meetings.

The Motorcycle Advisory Commission for Highway Safety shall be composed of seven (7) members, appointed as follows:

One (1) representative of the Office of Project Delivery and Preservation within the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet’s Department of Highways, appointed by the Governor;

One (1) representative of the Office of Project Development within the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet’s Department of Highways, appointed by the Governor;

One (1) representative of the Department of Kentucky State Police, appointed by the Governor;

Two (2) representatives of the Kentucky Motorcycle Association, to be appointed by the Governor from a list of five (5) nominees selected by the association;

One (1) member of the Kentucky Motorcycle Safety Education Advisory Commission, appointed by the Governor; and

One (1) representative of the Kentucky Association of Highway Contractors, to be appointed by the Governor from a list of five (5) nominees selected by the association.

Members of the Motorcycle Advisory Commission for Highway Safety shall serve a term of four (4) years. Sitting members shall be eligible to succeed themselves.

Commission members shall receive no compensation for their services and shall not be compensated for expenses incurred from travel or in connection with the performance of their duties as commission members.

The commission shall elect its chair and vice chair from its membership.

The commission shall meet quarterly or upon the call of the chair or the request of the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet.

A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum and the commission may make recommendations only at meetings where a quorum is present.

The commission shall keep a record of its meetings and recommendations.

For administrative purposes, the commission shall be attached to the Office of Highway Safety within the Department of Highways.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 122, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 85, § 184, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 13, § 8, effective June 25, 2009.

176.5061.
Motorcycle safety education program — Standards — Administrative regulations.

The Transportation Cabinet shall establish a motorcycle safety education program. The program shall provide for instructor training courses, instructor approval, and rider training courses for novice riders that shall be held at locations accessible to Kentucky residents. The program may provide for the following:

Rider training courses for novice and experienced riders;

Activities to increase the awareness of a motorcyclist’s knowledge of the effects of alcohol and drug use;

Driver improvement efforts;

Licensing improvement efforts;

Program promotion activities;

Enhancement of the public’s awareness of motorcycles; and

Enhancement of motorcycle safety through education.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, governing the development of standards for, and the administration of, a motorcycle safety education program. Standards for the motorcycle rider training courses shall include standards for course content, delivery, curriculum, materials, student evaluation, and the training and approval of instructors. Standards shall meet or exceed established national standards for motorcycle rider training courses prescribed by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 51, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 39, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 188, § 3, effective June 29, 2021; renumbered from KRS §

15A.350

by 2021 ch. 190, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

176.5062.
Motorcycle rider training courses — Exemption from motorcycle driver’s license skill test.

The motorcycle safety education program shall offer motorcycle rider training courses designed to develop and instill the knowledge, attitudes, habits, and skills necessary for the proper operation of a motorcycle. The courses shall be taught by instructors approved under KRS

176.5063

and shall include no fewer than eight (8) hours of hands-on instruction for a novice course.

Rider training courses shall be open to a resident of any state who is eligible for a motor vehicle instruction permit in the person’s home state.

Rider training courses shall be provided free of charge to applicants under eighteen (18) years of age.

The cabinet shall issue certificates of completion in a manner and form prescribed by administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to persons who satisfactorily complete the requirements of a motorcycle rider training course offered or authorized by the state program.

The Transportation Cabinet shall exempt applicants for a motorcycle driver’s license or endorsement from the licensing skill test if they present satisfactory evidence of successful completion of an approved rider training course that includes a similar test of skill. Applicants under this subsection who successfully completed their testing on a three (3) wheeled motorcycle shall be subject to the restrictions outlined in KRS 186.480(3).

The Motorcycle Safety Education Commission shall publish a list of approved rider training courses which meet the licensing requirements.

The Motorcycle Safety Education Commission shall publish a list of approved instructor training courses which meet the licensing requirements.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 2005; 2018 ch. 39, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; renumbered from KRS §

15A.352

by 2021 ch. 190, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

176.5063.
Instructors — Requirements for approval — Approval of nonresidents — Review of status every two years.

The cabinet shall approve instructors for the motorcycle rider training courses. A person shall not be approved as an instructor unless the person meets the requirements of this section and administrative regulations of the cabinet and holds a currently valid instructor certification issued by the governing body of a program approved under KRS 176.5062(6)(b).

The program shall offer instructor training courses to prepare instructors to teach the motorcycle rider training courses. Successful completion of the instructor training course shall require the participant to demonstrate knowledge of the course material, knowledge of proper motorcycle operation, motorcycle riding proficiency, and the necessary aptitude for instructing students. A person shall not be approved as an instructor unless the person has successfully completed the instructor training course or an equivalent course offered in another state.

The cabinet shall establish additional requirements for the approval of instructors, including but not limited to the following:

The person shall have a high school diploma or its equivalent;

The person shall be at least eighteen (18) years of age and hold a valid motorcycle driver’s license or endorsement;

The person shall have at least two (2) years of recent motorcycle riding experience; and

The person’s driver’s license shall not have been suspended or revoked at any time during the preceding two (2) years or at any time within the preceding five (5) years for any alcohol or drug related offense.

In the case of a nonresident, the cabinet shall obtain and review the person’s driving record from the state where the person is licensed prior to approval or reapproval of the person as an instructor.

The cabinet shall review the status of all approved instructors at least once every two (2) years and shall withdraw approval from any instructor who is no longer qualified under the requirements of this section. The cabinet shall immediately withdraw approval of an instructor when it receives adequate notice of any disqualification.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 3, effective July 1, 2005; 2018 ch. 39, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; renumbered from KRS §

15A.354

by 2021 ch. 190, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

176.5064.
Powers of cabinet.

The cabinet may enter into contracts with public or private entities for course delivery and for the provision of services or materials necessary for implementation of the program.

The cabinet may offer motorcycle rider training courses directly and may approve courses offered by independent public or private entities as authorized program courses if they are administered and taught in full compliance with standards established for the state program.

The cabinet may establish by administrative regulation reasonable enrollment fees to be charged for persons who participate in motorcycle rider training courses offered by the cabinet and for persons who participate in approved courses offered by independent public or private entities.

The cabinet may utilize up to ten percent (10%) of available program funds each fiscal year to defray its own expenses in offering motorcycle rider training courses and may reimburse entities that offer approved courses for the expenses incurred in offering the courses to minimize course enrollment fees charged to the students.

The cabinet shall provide meeting facilities and administrative assistance and support to the Motorcycle Safety Education Commission and the expenses shall be paid from the budget of the cabinet. The cabinet shall prepare and maintain all minutes of the commission’s proceedings and shall be the custodian of all files and records of the commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 4, effective July 1, 2005; renumbered from KRS §

15A.356

by 2021 ch. 190, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

176.5065.
Motorcycle safety education program fund.

The motorcycle safety education program fund is established as a restricted fund in the State Treasury. Moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in KRS

176.5061

to

176.5069

. Moneys in the fund shall be utilized to provide motorcycle training courses as established in KRS

176.5062

and for implementation of the program, including reimbursement of entities that offer approved motorcycle rider education courses. The Transportation Cabinet may deduct up to ten percent (10%) of available program funds per fiscal year for administrative costs from the motorcycle safety education program fund.

If at the end of each fiscal year money remains in the fund, it shall be retained in the fund. The interest and income earned on money in the fund, after deducting any applicable charges, shall be credited to the motorcycle safety education program fund.

The following revenue shall be credited to the fund:

Four dollars ($4) of the annual registration fee for each registered motorcycle as provided in KRS

186.535

;

Four dollars ($4) of the application fee for a motorcycle instruction permit as provided in KRS

186.531

;

Ten dollars ($10) of the fee for each original or renewal motorcycle driver’s license or endorsement as provided in KRS

186.531

; and

Any federal or state motorcycle safety funds granted to the program.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 5, effective July 1, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 52, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 100, § 36, effective January 1, 2019; 2018 ch. 39, § 5, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 39, § 6, effective January 1, 2019; renumbered from KRS §

15A.358

by 2021 ch. 190, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

176.5066.
Revenues relating to motorcycle safety education program fund — Report.

The Transportation Cabinet shall report monthly to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on the revenues deposited into the motorcycle safety education program fund, the expenditures incurred, and the available balance in the fund. In addition, the cabinet shall identify the safety programs provided, the cost of the programs, location, and number of attendees. To facilitate the timely reporting of data under this section, the cabinet shall enter into agreements with entities that provide the training to require monthly billing and attendance records.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 6, effective July 1, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 53, effective June 26, 2007; renumbered from KRS §

15A.360

by 2021 ch. 190, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.